Utah statutes.
73-4-8.   In case of use for mining or milling.
If water claimed to have been appropriated is used for milling or mining, the
statement shall show, in addition to the facts required by Section 73-4-5, the
name of the mill and its location, or the name of the mine and the mining
district in which it is situated; the nature of the material milled or mined,
and the point where the water is returned to the natural stream or source.
